Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1808
Victim; compensation; health care provider; reimbursement; submit medical reports; hearing officer; order.

In order to be eligible for compensation the applicant, including a health care provider as described in section 81-1807, shall, prior to any hearing on an application, submit available reports from any physician or surgeon who has treated or examined the victim in relation to the injury for which compensation is claimed at the time of or subsequent to the victim's injury or death. If, in the opinion of the hearing officer or the committee, reports on the previous medical history of the victim, a report on the examination of the injured victim, or a report on the cause of death of the victim by an impartial medical expert would be of material aid to its determination, the hearing officer or the committee shall order the reports and examination.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 9;

Laws 2021, LB497, § 3.